src/morphology/affixes/quantifiers.lexc
LEXICON NUM_KUUZI !!= @CODE@ kuuzi:kuud
+Num+Card+Sg@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@:%^D2Z%>i@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@ NUM-NOM ;
+Num+Card+Sg@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@:000@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@ NUM-SG-PAR_tu ;
+Num+Card+Sg@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@:e%^WGStem0@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@ NUM-USUALLY-WEAK ;
+Num+Card+Sg@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@:e00@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@ NUM-USUALLY-STRONG ;
+Num+Card+Pl@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@:e%^WGStemt@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@ NUM-NOM ;
+Num+Card+Pl@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@:%^D2Z%>i@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@ NUM-PL-GEN_EN ;
+Num+Card+Pl0@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@:%^D2Z%>ii@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@ NUM-PL-PAR_Zero ;
+Num+Card+Pl@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@:%^D2Z%>i@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@ NUM-INS ;
+Num+Card+Pl@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@:%^D2Z%>i@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@ NUM-USUALLY-WEAK ;
+Num+Card+Pl@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@:%^D2Z%>i@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@ NUM-USUALLY-STRONG ;
:e%^WGStem ORD_01_BACK ;

LEXICON NUM_VIIZI !!= @CODE@ viizi:viid
+Num+Card+Sg@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@:%^D2Z%>i@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@ NUM-NOM ;
+Num+Card+Sg@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@:000@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@ NUM-SG-PAR_ty ;
+Num+Card+Sg@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@:e%^WGStem0@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@ NUM-USUALLY-WEAK ;
+Num+Card+Sg@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@:e00@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@ NUM-USUALLY-STRONG ;
+Num+Card+Pl@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@:e%^WGStemt@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@ NUM-NOM ;
+Num+Card+Pl@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@:%^D2Z%>i@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@ NUM-PL-GEN_EN ;
+Num+Card+Pl0@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@:%^D2Z%>ii@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@ NUM-PL-PAR_Zero ;
+Num+Card+Pl@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@:%^D2Z%>i@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@ NUM-INS ;
+Num+Card+Pl@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@:%^D2Z%>i@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@ NUM-USUALLY-WEAK ;
+Num+Card+Pl@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@:%^D2Z%>i@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@ NUM-USUALLY-STRONG ;
:e%^WGStem ORD_01_FRONT ;

LEXICON NUM_KYMMENE !!= @CODE@ kymmene:kymmen
+Num+Card+Sg@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@:e00@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@ NUM-NOM ;
+Num+Card+Sg@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@:000@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@ NUM-SG-PAR_ty ;
+Num+Card+Sg@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@:e00@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@ NUM-USUALLY-WEAK ;
+Num+Card+Sg@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@:e00@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@ NUM-USUALLY-STRONG ;
+Num+Card+Pl@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@:et0@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@ NUM-NOM ;
+Num+Card+Pl@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@:i00@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@ NUM-PL-GEN_EN ;
+Num+Card+Pl@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@:ii0@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@ NUM-PL-PAR_Zero ;
+Num+Card+Pl@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@:i00@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@ NUM-INS ;
+Num+Card+Pl@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@:i00@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@ NUM-USUALLY-WEAK ;
+Num+Card+Pl@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@:i00@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@ NUM-USUALLY-STRONG ;
:e%^WGStem ORD_01_FRONT ;

LEXICON NUM_KOLME !!= @CODE@ 
+Num+Card:e SGNOMSUF ;
+Num+Card:e SGGENSUF ;
+Num+Card:e SGPARSUF_A2 ;

+Num+Card+Sg:e Noun-NB-01 ;
:a ORD_01_BACK ;

LEXICON QNT_
+TYÄ+Qnt: # ;

LEXICON ORD_
+TYÄ+Num+Ord: # ;

LEXICON ORD_TOINE !!= @CODE@ toine:to
+Num+Ord@U.NUM-TYPE.ORD@:00@U.NUM-TYPE.ORD@ NMN_TOINE ;


LEXICON ORD_KARJALAINE !!= @CODE@ enzimäine:ensimä
+Num+Ord: NMN_KARJALAINE ;

LEXICON ORD_LIYGILÄINE !!= @CODE@ enzimäine:ensimä
+Num+Ord@U.NUM-TYPE.ORD@:00@U.NUM-TYPE.ORD@ NMN_LIYGILÄINE ;

LEXICON ORD_01_BACK
+Num+Ord+Sg@U.NUM-TYPE.ORD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@:%>s0@U.NUM-TYPE.ORD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@ NUM-NOM ;
+Num+Ord+Sg@U.NUM-TYPE.ORD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@:t00@U.NUM-TYPE.ORD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@ NUM-SG-PAR_tu ;
+Num+Ord+Sg@U.NUM-TYPE.ORD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@:nde@U.NUM-TYPE.ORD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@ NUM-SG-GEN ;
+Num+Ord+Sg@U.NUM-TYPE.ORD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@:nde@U.NUM-TYPE.ORD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@ NUM-USUALLY-WEAK ;
+Num+Ord+Sg@U.NUM-TYPE.ORD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@:nde@U.NUM-TYPE.ORD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@ NUM-USUALLY-STRONG ;
+Num+Ord+Pl0@U.NUM-TYPE.ORD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@:ndet@U.NUM-TYPE.ORD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@ NUM-NOM ;
+Num+Ord+Pl0@U.NUM-TYPE.ORD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@:nzii@U.NUM-TYPE.ORD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@ NUM-PL-PAR_Zero ;
+Num+Ord+Pl@U.NUM-TYPE.ORD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@:nzi@U.NUM-TYPE.ORD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@ NUM-PL-GEN_EN ;
+Num+Ord+Pl@U.NUM-TYPE.ORD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@:nzi@U.NUM-TYPE.ORD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@ NUM-USUALLY-WEAK ;
+Num+Ord+Pl@U.NUM-TYPE.ORD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@:nzi@U.NUM-TYPE.ORD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@ NUM-USUALLY-STRONG ;
+Num+Ord+Pl@U.NUM-TYPE.ORD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@:nzi@U.NUM-TYPE.ORD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@ NUM-INS ;

LEXICON ORD_01_FRONT
+Num+Ord+Sg@U.NUM-TYPE.ORD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@:%>s0@U.NUM-TYPE.ORD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@ NUM-NOM ;
+Num+Ord+Sg@U.NUM-TYPE.ORD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@:t00@U.NUM-TYPE.ORD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@ NUM-SG-PAR_ty ;
+Num+Ord+Sg@U.NUM-TYPE.ORD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@:nde@U.NUM-TYPE.ORD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@ NUM-SG-GEN ;
+Num+Ord+Sg@U.NUM-TYPE.ORD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@:nde@U.NUM-TYPE.ORD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@ NUM-USUALLY-WEAK ;
+Num+Ord+Sg@U.NUM-TYPE.ORD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@:nde@U.NUM-TYPE.ORD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@ NUM-USUALLY-STRONG ;
+Num+Ord+Pl0@U.NUM-TYPE.ORD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@:ndet@U.NUM-TYPE.ORD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@ NUM-NOM ;
+Num+Ord+Pl0@U.NUM-TYPE.ORD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@:nzii@U.NUM-TYPE.ORD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@ NUM-PL-PAR_Zero ;
+Num+Ord+Pl@U.NUM-TYPE.ORD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@:nzi@U.NUM-TYPE.ORD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@ NUM-PL-GEN_EN ;
+Num+Ord+Pl@U.NUM-TYPE.ORD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@:nzi@U.NUM-TYPE.ORD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@ NUM-USUALLY-WEAK ;
+Num+Ord+Pl@U.NUM-TYPE.ORD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@:nzi@U.NUM-TYPE.ORD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@ NUM-USUALLY-STRONG ;
+Num+Ord+Pl@U.NUM-TYPE.ORD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@:nzi@U.NUM-TYPE.ORD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@ NUM-INS ;

LEXICON NUM-USUALLY-WEAK
 NUM-ABE ;
 NUM-ABL ;
 NUM-ADE ;
 NUM-ALL ;
 NUM-ELA ;
 NUM-ESS ;
 NUM-INE ;
 NUM-PRL ;
 NUM-TRA ;

LEXICON NUM-USUALLY-STRONG
 NUM-ILL ;
 NUM-TER ;

LEXICON NUM-ABE
+Abe0000@U.DECL-CX.ABE@:%>tt%{aäPar%}h@U.DECL-CX.ABE@ SUBSEQUENT-NUM_OPT ;
+Abe00@U.DECL-CX.ABE@:%>t%{aäPar%}@U.DECL-CX.ABE@ SUBSEQUENT-NUM_OPT ;
+Abe+Err/Sub00@U.DECL-CX.ABE@:%>tt%{aäPar%}@U.DECL-CX.ABE@ SUBSEQUENT-NUM_OPT ;

LEXICON NUM-ABL
+Abl0000@U.DECL-CX.ABL@:%>lpäi@U.DECL-CX.ABL@ NO-SUBSEQUENT-NUM_OPT ;
+Abl0@U.DECL-CX.ABL@:%>l@U.DECL-CX.ABL@ SUBSEQUENT-NUM_OPT ;

LEXICON NUM-ADE
+Ade0@U.DECL-CX.ADE@:%>l@U.DECL-CX.ADE@ SUBSEQUENT-NUM_OPT ;

LEXICON NUM-ALL
+All00@U.DECL-CX.ALL@:%>le@U.DECL-CX.ALL@ SUBSEQUENT-NUM_OPT ;

LEXICON NUM-SG-GEN
+Gen0@U.DECL-CX.GEN@:%>n@U.DECL-CX.GEN@ K ;
+Acc0@U.DECL-CX.ACC@:%>n@U.DECL-CX.ACC@ K ;
+Com000@U.DECL-CX.COM@:%>nke@U.DECL-CX.COM@ K ;
+Apr0000@U.DECL-CX.APR@:%>ll%{uy%}%{oö%}@U.DECL-CX.APR@ K ;
+Ins0@U.DECL-CX.INS@:%>n@U.DECL-CX.INS@ K ;

LEXICON NUM-PL-GEN_EN
+Gen00@U.DECL-CX.GEN@:%>en@U.DECL-CX.GEN@ SUBSEQUENT-NUM_OPT ;
+Com0000@U.DECL-CX.COM@:%>enke@U.DECL-CX.COM@ SUBSEQUENT-NUM_OPT ;
+Apr00000@U.DECL-CX.APR@:%>ell%{uy%}%{oö%}@U.DECL-CX.APR@ SUBSEQUENT-NUM_OPT ;

LEXICON NUM-PL-GEN_N
+Gen0@U.DECL-CX.GEN@:%>n@U.DECL-CX.GEN@ SUBSEQUENT-NUM_OPT ;
+Com000@U.DECL-CX.COM@:%>nke@U.DECL-CX.COM@ SUBSEQUENT-NUM_OPT ;
+Apr0000@U.DECL-CX.APR@:%>ll%{uy%}%{oö%}@U.DECL-CX.APR@ SUBSEQUENT-NUM_OPT ;

LEXICON NUM-ELA
+Ela0000@U.DECL-CX.ELA@:%>späi@U.DECL-CX.ELA@ K ;
+Ela0@U.DECL-CX.ELA@:%>s@U.DECL-CX.ELA@ SUBSEQUENT-NUM_OPT ;

LEXICON NUM-ESS
+Ess000@U.DECL-CX.ESS@:%>nn%{uy%}@U.DECL-CX.ESS@ SUBSEQUENT-NUM_OPT ;

LEXICON NUM-ILL
+Ill0@U.DECL-CX.ILL@:%>h@U.DECL-CX.ILL@ SUBSEQUENT-NUM_OPT ;

LEXICON NUM-INE
+Ine0@U.DECL-CX.INE@:%>s@U.DECL-CX.INE@ SUBSEQUENT-NUM_OPT ;

LEXICON NUM-INS
+Ins0@U.DECL-CX.INS@:%>@U.DECL-CX.INS@ SUBSEQUENT-NUM_OPT ;

LEXICON NUM-NOM
+Nom@U.DECL-CX.NOM@:0@U.DECL-CX.NOM@ SUBSEQUENT-NUM_OPT ;

LEXICON NUM-SG-PAR_a
+Par00@U.DECL-CX.PAR@:%>a@U.DECL-CX.PAR@ SUBSEQUENT-NUM_OPT ;

LEXICON NUM-SG-PAR_ä
+Par00@U.DECL-CX.PAR@:%>ä@U.DECL-CX.PAR@ SUBSEQUENT-NUM_OPT ;

LEXICON NUM-SG-PAR_tu
+Par00@U.DECL-CX.PAR@:%>tu@U.DECL-CX.PAR@ SUBSEQUENT-NUM_OPT ;
