src/morphology/stems/quantifiers.lexc
LEXICON quantifiers
toine:to ORD_TOINE  "toinen" ;
enzimäine:enzimä ORD_KARJALAINE  "" ;
ezmäine:ezmä ORD_KARJALAINE  "" ;
kaheksas:kaheksa ORD_01_BACK  "" ;
kolme:kolm NUM_KOLME  "kolme" ;
kolmei:kolmei QNT_  "" ;
kuvves:kuvve ORD_01_BACK  "" ;
kuuzi:kuud NUM_KUUZI  "" ;
kuvvei:kuvvei QNT_  "" ;
kuvvestostu:kuvvestostu ORD_  "" ;
kymmene:kymmen NUM_KYMMENE  "" ;
kymmenes:kymmene ORD_01_FRONT  "" ;
nelläskymmenes:nelläskymmen ORD_  "" ;
nellästostu:nellästostu ORD_  "" ;
nelläs:nellä ORD_01_FRONT  "" ;
puolitostu:puolitostu QNT_  "" ;
puolitostusadua:puolitostusadua QNT_  "" ;
sadas:sada ORD_  "" ;
seiččemäs:seiččemä ORD_01_FRONT  "" ;
seiččiei:seiččiei QNT_  "" ;
toine:to ORD_TOINE  "" ;
viijes:viije ORD_01_FRONT  "" ;
viiei:viiei QNT_  "" ;
viizi:viid NUM_VIIZI  "" ;
yheksäs:yheksä ORD_01_FRONT  "" ;
